Indiana, session 2026, HB1434.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-8.5-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The following terms apply throughout this
section:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly
through one (1) or more intermediaries:
(A) controls;
(B) is controlled by; or
(C) is under common control with;
a specified person. The term includes a parent company or a
subsidiary.
(2) "Meeting", with respect to the regional transmission
organization, means a meeting of the following:
(A) The following permanent standing committees or their
successors:
(i) The planning committee.
(ii) The operating committee.
2026 IN 1434—LS 6078/DI 101


(iii) The market implementation committee.
(iv) The risk management committee.
(B) Any senior task force that is active during the calendar
year with respect to which a report is submitted by a
public utility under subsection (b).
(3) Notwithstanding section 1 of this chapter, "public utility"
means a utility that is:
(A) listed in 170 IAC 4-7-2(a); and
(B) a member of the regional transmission organization.
(4) "Recorded vote" means a vote that is tabulated, either
individually or as part of an industry sector, at a meeting. The
term does not include a vote in an election for one (1) or more
leadership positions on the board of managers or a committee.
(5) "Regional transmission organization" refers to the
regional transmission organization known as the PJM
Interconnection, LLC that operates the bulk power
transmission system serving parts of Indiana.
(b) Beginning in 2027, not later than February 1 of each year, a
public utility shall file with the commission a report, on a form
specified by the commission, that:
(1) lists, or otherwise provides access to information on, each
recorded vote cast by:
(A) the public utility; and
(B) any affiliate of the public utility;
at a meeting of the regional transmission organization during
the immediately preceding calendar year, regardless of
whether the vote is disclosed by the regional transmission
organization; and
(2) includes a brief description explaining how each vote
identified under subdivision (1) supports the provision of
electric utility service with the attributes set forth in
IC 8-1-2-0.6, including:
(A) reliability;
(B) affordability;
(C) resiliency;
(D) stability; and
(E) environmental sustainability.
(c) Upon receiving a report from a public utility under
subsection (b), the commission shall post the report on the
commission's website.
(d) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section, including a rule prescribing the form to be
2026 IN 1434—LS 6078/DI 101


used by a public utility in filing the report required under
subsection (b).
2026 IN 1434—LS 6078/DI 101